Washington statutes.
RCW 35.70.050

Council's resolution and notice—Contents.

The resolution and notice and order to construct a sidewalk shall:

(1) Describe each parcel of land abutting upon that portion and side of the street where the sidewalk is ordered to be constructed,

(2) Specify the kind of sidewalk required, its size and dimensions, the method and material to be used in construction,

(3) Contain an estimate of the cost thereof, and

(4) State that unless the sidewalk is constructed in compliance with the notice, and within a reasonable time therein specified, the city or town will construct the sidewalk and assess the cost and expense thereof against the abutting property described in the notice.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.70.050. Prior: 1915 c 149 s 3; RRS s 9157.]